Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders

194A.600.
Definitions for KRS 194A.600 to 194A.609.

As used in KRS 194A.600 to 194A.609:

“Council” means the Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Advisory Council;

“Dementia” means Alzheimer’s disease and related dementia illnesses and disorders; and

“Office” means the Office of Dementia Services.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 6, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2021 ch. 52, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

194A.601.
Office of Dementia Services — Purpose, director, and duties.

The Office of Dementia Services is established within the cabinet. The purpose of the office is to oversee information and resources related to policy and services affecting residents of Kentucky with dementia, and the caregivers and families of the residents.

The dementia services coordinator shall be a full-time, permanent employee and shall be responsible for the staffing and operational details of the office. A report on the operations of the office shall be made to the secretary within ninety (90) days of June 29, 2021. An annual report on the operation of the office shall be made to the Interim Joint Committee on Health, Welfare, and Family Services by December 1 of each year.

The duties of the office shall include but not be limited to:

Creating, implementing, and updating the Kentucky Alzheimer’s and Related Dementias State Plan;

Coordinating and managing the Alzheimer’s Disease and Related DisordersAdvisory Council;

Assessing and analyzing dementia-specific data collected by the cabinet, including the behavioral risk factor surveillance system, and data from other relevant departments and divisions;

Evaluating of state-funded dementia services;

Identifying and supporting the development of dementia-specific trainings;

Streamlining all applicable state government services to increase efficiency and improve the quality of care in residential and home and community-based settings;

Identifying any duplicative services to eliminate all unnecessary costs;

Identifying and applying for grant opportunities to expand the scope of services while reducing state costs; and

Completing other duties relevant to supporting policy development and implementation to support individuals with dementia and their family caregivers.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 6, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2021 ch. 52, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

194A.603.
Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Advisory Council — Membership, duties, and personnel.

The Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Advisory Council is created. The council shall report directly to the office.

The council shall be composed of the following fifteen (15) members:

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Aging and Independent Living or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Public Health or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services or his or her designee;

The state long-term care ombudsman or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Area Agencies on Aging or his or her designee;

One (1) individual who is the family caregiver of an individual living with Alzheimer’s disease or another dementia, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties;

One (1) individual who represents the residential long-term care industry, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties;

One (1) individual who represents providers of adult day care services, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties;

One (1) individual who represents the home care providers, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties;

One (1) individual employed by and representing an organization that advocates solely on behalf of physicians, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties;

One (1) individual employed by and representing an organization that advocates solely on behalf of nurses, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties;

One (1) individual who conducts research regarding Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties;

One (1) individual who represents an organization that advocates solely on behalf of individuals living with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementias, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties; and

One (1) individual representing a statewide organization that advocates on behalf of Kentuckians aged fifty (50) or older, appointed by the Governor from a list of names of qualified persons submitted by any interested parties.

Members who are not state employees shall be reimbursed for necessary and actual expenses.

The council shall meet at least quarterly and at other such times as it determines necessary to perform its duties. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the council’s business.

The council shall:

Elect its own chairperson and establish other officers and subcommittees as needed to execute the duties of the council;

Adopt bylaws and operate under its bylaws;

Starting on July 1, 2021, and repeating every four (4) years after that date, submit an updated Kentucky Alzheimer’s and Related Dementias State Plan to the Governor for his or her approval and thereafter make it available to the General Assembly. If the council determines that amendments need to be made to the state plan, an amended Kentucky Alzheimer’s and Related Dementia State Plan may be presented to the Governor for review and approval;

Starting on July 1, 2021, and repeating every year after that date, submit an annual report on the implementation progress of the Kentucky Alzheimer’s and Related Dementias State Plan to the Governor. This annual report shall include a summary of the progress toward implementation of the state plan and recommendations for amendments to the state plan; and

Serve in an advisory capacity to the Governor, the General Assembly, the cabinet and all other state agencies on matters relating to the Kentucky Alzheimer’s and Related Dementias State Plan. The council shall review and make recommendations regarding progress towards the goals of the state plan and on progress in implementing resources and services to serve individuals with dementia and related diseases across Kentucky in the future.

Members shall serve for a term of two (2) years and may be reappointed. All subsequent appointments or reappointments shall be for terms of two (2) years. If an appointee resigns or is otherwise unable to complete the appointed term, the Governor shall appoint a new individual whose expertise or experience satisfies the vacated position within ninety (90) days.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 6, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2021 ch. 52, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

194A.609.
Promulgation of administrative regulations to implement KRS 194A.600 to 194A.609.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A sufficient to implement KRS 194A.600 to 194A.609.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 6, § 6, effective July 14, 2000.